Massachusetts, session 194th, S2458.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 33 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 139 the
following section:
Section 140. There shall be a Guard Enlistment Enhancement Program (GEEP) to
support the ongoing domestic operations and the increasing demands upon the members of the
Massachusetts National Guard underscoring the need to recruit and retain skilled Soldiers and
Airmen. Massachusetts must maintain its National Guard in a robust posture to ensure mission
readiness with each unit fully manned to the extent authorized by law. The purpose of the GEEP
is to motivate Soldiers, Airmen, and retirees to boost the Massachusetts National Guard's
recruitment efforts by using their non-duty hours to recruit new members into the force. As set
forth in this section, the Adjutant General of the Massachusetts National Guard shall provide
of 2

compensation to members of the Massachusetts National Guard and Massachusetts National
Guard retirees (collectively, "recruiting assistants") who assist in the recruitment of a new
member for the Massachusetts National Guard. Eligible recruiting assistants consist of current
service members in the Massachusetts National Guard or Massachusetts National Guard retirees
as designated in the GEEP implementation policy maintained by the Massachusetts National
Guard. Recruiting assistants rendering assistance pursuant to this section shall be compensated
no more than $1,000 for each new or prior service recruit that the recruiting assistant brings into
the Massachusetts National Guard. The Massachusetts National Guard shall publish and maintain
written policies regarding the execution of the GEEP consistent with the provisions of this
section.
of 2